Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1914.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 342 of Title 66, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Branch line” means a secondary railroad track that branches
off from a main railroad line;
2. “Conductor” means a conductor, switchman, brakeman,
trainman, or fireman, who is licensed and certified by the Federal
Railroad Administration;
3. “Engineer” means an engineer who is licensed and certified
by the Federal Railroad Administration;
Req. No. 10073 Page 1

4. “Main line” shall mean a Class I railroad, as documented in
current timetables filed by the Class I railroad with the Federal
Railroad Administration, over which five million or more gross tons
of railroad traffic are transported annually or used for regularly
scheduled intercity or commuter rail passenger service, or both;
5. “Physical manifest document” means tangible paper
documentation of railroad train freight inventory and any applicable
train engine data;
6. “Railroad management” means a rail employee overseeing and
assisting in rail transit operation; and
7. “Tangible railroad identification” means physical railroad
identification that is not electronic with Federal Railroad
Administration conductor or engineer certification.
B. 1. No railroad operating inside this state on any main
track or branch line shall run, or permit to be run, any train which
is not traveling with at least one copy of the physical manifest
documents, a current physical copy of the Emergency Response Guide,
and a current physical copy of 49 CFR Part 240 and 242 certificate
for identification purposes.
2. No conductor, engineer, railroad management, or railroad or
public transit employee operating in this state on any main track or
branch line, shall run or permit to be run, any train which is not
traveling with tangible railroad identification.

Req. No. 10073 Page 2

3. Any person or railroad corporation that violates any
provisions of this act shall be liable for a civil penalty of at
least Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) but not more
than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). A separate violation of
this section shall occur each day a railroad is not in compliance.
When a grossly negligent violation or pattern of repeated violations
has occurred which results in an imminent hazard of death or injury
to individuals or has caused a death or injury, a one-time fine up
to Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) may be imposed.
The Department of Transportation may assess penalties for any
violation of this section. Notice of a violation of this section
shall be communicated to the railroad by two separate means.
Acceptable means of communication may include electronic mail,
telephone, U.S. mail, or text message. All amounts collected shall
be deposited in the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
established pursuant to Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statues.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10073 JBH 11/22/24




Req. No. 10073 Page 3